Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 1. Joint Reapportionment Committee.

§§ 24.2-300 through 24.2-301.1.
Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 1000.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to Joint Reapportionment Committee, see Chapter 39 (§ 30-263 et seq.) of Title 30.

Editor’s note.

Former §§

24.2-300

through 24.2-301.1 were repealed and recodified as Chapter 39 (§ 30-263 et seq.) of Title 30.